California statutes. Insurance Code
(b) Any insurer or agent willfully violating any provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and is punishable by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation thereof.

(c) There shall be no liability on the part of, and no cause of action of any nature shall arise against, the Insurance Commissioner or against any insurer, its authorized representative, its agents, its employees, or any firm, person or corporation furnishing to the insurer information as to the reasons for such a refusal, for any statement made by any of them in any written notice of reasons for refusing to accept the application or issue the policy or in any other communication, oral or written, specifying the reasons for such action or the providing of the information pertaining thereto, or for statements made or evidence submitted in any hearings conducted in connection therewith.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 177.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

658.

Where any admitted insurer, licensed to issue motor vehicle liability policies as defined in Section 16450 of the Vehicle Code, refuses to accept an applicant for a good driver discount policy as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1861.02 or refuses to issue a good driver discount policy when written application has been made, and where the applicant meets the criteria for purchase of a good driver discount policy, the refusing insurer shall furnish the applicant for insurance a written statement within 10 days of the refusal explaining the reason or reasons relied upon for denying insurance coverage. Notwithstanding Section 1633.3 of the Civil Code, the written statement explaining the reason or reasons for denying the coverage may not be electronically delivered to the applicant unless the
 application for the good driver discount was electronically delivered to the insurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 433, Sec. 7.   (AB 328)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Cancellation or Failure to Renew [660. - 669.5.]

660.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Policy” means an automobile liability, automobile physical damage, or automobile collision policy, or any combination thereof, delivered or issued for delivery in this state, insuring a single individual or individuals residing in the same household, as named insured, and under which the insured vehicles therein designated are of the following types only:

(1) A motor vehicle of the private passenger or station wagon type that is not used as a public or livery conveyance for passengers, nor rented to others; or

(2) Any
 other four-wheel motor vehicle with a load capacity of 1,500 pounds or less; provided, however, that this chapter shall not apply to any of the following:

(A) Any policy issued under an automobile assigned risk plan.

(B) Any policy insuring more than four automobiles.

(C) Any policy covering garage, automobile sales agency, repair shop, service station, or public parking place operation hazards.

(3) A motorcycle.

(b) “Automobile liability coverage” includes only coverage of bodily injury and property damage liability, medical payments, and uninsured motorists coverage.

(c) “Automobile physical damage coverage” includes all coverage of loss or damage to an automobile insured under the policy except loss or damage resulting from collision or upset.

(d) “Automobile collision coverage” includes all coverage of loss or damage to an automobile insured under the policy resulting from collision or upset.

(e) “Renewal” or “to renew” means to continue coverage with either the insurer which issued the policy or an affiliated insurer, as defined in Section 1215, for an additional policy period upon expiration of the current policy period of a policy, provided that if coverage is continued with an affiliated insurer, it shall be the same or broader coverage as provided by the present insurer, and the insured shall be notified in writing at least 20 days prior to expiration of the current policy period of all of the following:

(1) That the insurer has determined that it will not offer renewal of the policy with the present insurer.

(2) That it is offering replacement in an affiliated insurer.

(3) That the insured may obtain in writing the reasons for the change in insurers if he or she requests in writing not later than one month following the expiration of the policy period the reason or reasons for the change in insurers. Any policy with a policy period or term of six months or less, whether or not made continuous for successive terms upon the payment of additional premiums, shall, for the purpose of this chapter be considered as if written for a policy period or term of six months. Any policy written for a term longer than one year, or any policy with no fixed expiration date, shall for the purpose of this chapter, be considered as if written for successive policy periods or terms of one year.

(f) “Nonpayment of premium” means failure of the named insured to discharge when due any of his obligations in connection with
 the payment of premiums on a policy, or any installment of such premium, whether the premium is payable directly to the insurer or its agent or indirectly under any premium finance plan or extension of credit.

(g) “Cancellation” means termination of coverage by an insurer (other than termination at the request of the insured) during a policy period.

(h) “Nonrenewal” means a notice by the insurer to the named insured that the insurer is unwilling to renew a policy.

(i) “Expiration” means termination of coverage by reason of
 the policy having reached the end of the term for which it was issued or the end of the period for which a premium has been paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 304, Sec. 1.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

661.

(a) A notice of cancellation of a policy shall be effective only if it is based on one or more of the following reasons:

(1) Nonpayment of premium.

(2) The driver’s license or motor vehicle registration of the named insured or of any other operator who either resides in the same household or customarily operates an automobile insured under the policy has been under suspension or revocation during the policy period or, if the policy is a renewal, during its policy period or the 180 days immediately preceding its effective date.

(3) Discovery of fraud by the
 named insured in pursuing a claim under the policy provided the insurer does not rescind the policy.

(4) Discovery of material misrepresentation of any of the following information concerning the named insured or any resident of the same household who customarily operates an automobile insured under the policy:

(A) Safety record.

(B) Annual miles driven in prior years.

(C) Number of years of driving experience.

(D) Record of prior automobile insurance claims, if any.

(E) Any other factor found by the commissioner to have a substantial relationship to the risk of loss.

Any insured who
 negligently misrepresents information described in this paragraph may avoid cancellation by furnishing corrected information to the insurer within 20 days after receiving notice of cancellation and agreeing to pay any difference in premium for the policy period in which the information remained undisclosed.

(5) A substantial increase in the hazard insured against.

(b) Modification of automobile physical damage coverage by the inclusion of a deductible not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) shall not be deemed a cancellation of the coverage or of the policy.

(c) This section shall not apply to nonrenewal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 786, Sec. 5.   (AB 2303)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

662.

(a) (1) A notice of cancellation of a policy shall not be effective unless mailed or delivered by the insurer to the named insured, lienholder, or additional interest at least 20 days prior to the effective date of cancellation; provided, however, that where cancellation is for nonpayment of premium, at least 10 days’ notice of cancellation after nonpayment of premium due by the specified due date accompanied by the reason for the cancellation shall be given. Unless the reason accompanies or is included in the notice of cancellation, the notice of cancellation shall
 state or be accompanied by a statement that upon written request of the named insured, mailed or delivered to the insurer not less than 15 days prior to the effective date of cancellation, the insurer will specify the reason for the cancellation.

(2) A cancellation based on nonpayment of premium shall only be effective on the date specified in the notice if the insured has not cured the nonpayment of premium due identified in the notice by the end of the 10-day period.

(b) This section shall not apply to nonrenewal.

(c) Notices made to lienholders
 pursuant to this section may be done electronically with the consent of the lienholder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 793, Sec. 1.   (SB 1295)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

662.1.

Proof of mailing or delivery of a notice of cancellation to a lienholder or an additional interest on a policy to which this chapter applies shall be sufficient to terminate the interest of the parties provided the notice is mailed or delivered at least the maximum number of days prior to termination of the parties’ interest as required by Section 662. For purposes of this section, “delivery” includes electronic transmittal or facsimile or personal delivery. No lienholder or additional interest shall require a more restrictive form of notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 401, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

663.

(a) Before policy expiration, an insurer shall deliver to or mail to the named insured, at the address shown on the policy, one of the following:

(1) At least 20 days before expiration, a written or verbal offer of renewal of the policy, contingent upon payment of premium as stated in the offer.

(2) At least 30 days before expiration, a written notice of nonrenewal of the policy, including the statement required by Section 666.

(b) (1) An insurer that delivers a verbal offer to renew that is declined by an insured shall, at least 20 days before expiration of the policy, deliver to or mail to the named insured, at the address shown on the policy, a written confirmation of the offer and rejection.

(2) An insurer that attempts to satisfy subdivision (a) with a verbal offer to renew, but is unable to contact the named insured directly at least 20 days before policy expiration, shall, at least 20 days before policy expiration, deliver to or mail to the named insured, at the address shown on the policy, a written offer to renew the policy, contingent upon payment of premium as stated in the offer.

(c) In
 the event that an insurer fails to give the named insured either an offer of renewal or notice of nonrenewal as required by this section, the existing policy, with no change in its terms and conditions, shall remain in effect for 30 days from the date that either the offer to renew or the notice of nonrenewal is delivered or mailed to the named insured. A notice to this effect shall be provided by the insurer to the named insured with the policy or the notice of renewal or nonrenewal. Notwithstanding the failure of an insurer to comply with this section, the policy shall terminate on the effective date of any other replacement or succeeding automobile insurance policy procured by the insured, or his agent or broker, with respect to any automobile designated in both policies.

(d) The insurer shall not be required to notify the named insured, or any other insured, of nonrenewal of the
 policy if the insurer has mailed or delivered a notice of expiration or cancellation, on or prior to the 30th day preceding expiration of the policy period.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 6) and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 369, Sec. 7.   (SB 251)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section operative January 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

663.5.

(a) No insurer shall fail to renew a policy solely on the basis of the age of the insured.

(b) On and after January 1, 2000, no insurer shall fail to renew a policy solely on the grounds that a claim is pending under the policy. This subdivision shall not be construed to limit an insurer’s ability to nonrenew a policy based upon a directive from the commissioner for solvency or other financially related issues. This subdivision shall not be construed to limit an insurer’s right to cancel a policy pursuant to Section 676.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 313, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

664.

Proof of mailing of notice of cancellation, or of intention not to renew or of reasons for cancellation, to the named insured at the address shown in the policy or to the named insured’s latest known address, shall be sufficient proof of notice.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 137.)
-------------------------------------------

664.5.

Any insurer who requires periodic physical examinations of an insured as a condition of renewal of a policy shall pay the cost of such physical examinations, except that an insurer shall not pay any cost if it elects to accept the certified written results of an insured’s physical examination voluntarily conducted within 12 months preceding the policy expiration or renewal date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 296.)
-------------------------------------------

665.

When a policy of automobile liability insurance is canceled, other than for nonpayment of premium, or in the event of failure to renew a policy of automobile liability insurance to which Section 663 applies, the insurer shall notify the named insured of his possible eligibility for automobile liability insurance through the automobile liability assigned risk plan. Such notice shall accompany or be included in the notice of cancellation or the notice of intent not to renew.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 137.)
-------------------------------------------

666.

Where the reason for cancellation does not accompany or is not included in the notice of cancellation, the insurer shall upon written request of the named insured, mailed or delivered to the insurer not less than 15 days prior to the effective date of cancellation, specify in writing the reason for the cancellation. The reason shall be mailed or delivered to the named insured within five days after receipt of the request. Notwithstanding Section 1633.3 of the Civil Code, the writing specifying the reason for cancellation may not be delivered electronically to the insured unless the insured electronically delivered the request to the insurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 433, Sec. 9.   (AB 328)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

667.

There shall be no liability on the part of, and no cause of action of any nature shall arise against, the Insurance Commissioner or against any insurer, its authorized representative, its agents, its employees, or any firm, person, or corporation furnishing to the insurer information as to reasons for cancellation or nonrenewal, for any statement made by any of them in any written notice of cancellation or nonrenewal, or in any other communication, oral or written, specifying the reasons for cancellation or nonrenewal, or the providing of information pertaining thereto, or for statements made or evidence submitted at any hearings conducted in connection therewith.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 227.)
-------------------------------------------

667.5.

Unless a policy specifically provides otherwise, the cancellation of a policy, or any change in the policy, executed by an insurer, at the request of the named insured designated on the declarations page of the policy, shall be binding upon any other insured or named insured.

Notice of cancellation or an endorsement evidencing the named insured’s request shall be mailed or delivered to the address stated in the policy to all individuals or to all entities designated as named insureds on the declarations page of the policy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1266, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

668.

Section 663 shall not apply to policies of liability insurance issued pursuant to assigned risk plans.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 595.)
-------------------------------------------

669.

Any insurer willfully violating any provisions of Section 663 is guilty of a misdemeanor and is punishable by a fine of not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 178.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

669.5.

No insurer shall fail to renew any private automobile insurance policy of a peace officer, member of the California Highway Patrol, or firefighter, with respect to his or her operation of a private motor vehicle, for the reason that the insured has been involved in an accident while operating an authorized emergency vehicle, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 165 of the Vehicle Code or in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b) or (f) of Section 165 of the Vehicle Code, in the performance of his or her duty during the hours of his or her employment. As used in this section, “peace officer” means every person defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 and Section 830.6 of the Penal Code, and “firefighter” means every person defined in Section 50925 of the Government Code.

In the case of a volunteer firefighter, this section applies to the regular employer of the volunteer firefighter to the extent that the involvement of the volunteer firefighter in the accident shall not be cause for the employer’s insurer’s decision to renew the employer’s insurance policy as it applies to the employee covered by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1098, Sec. 5.5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10.1. Certain Automobile Insurance [669.7. - 669.7.]

669.7.

Notwithstanding Section 660, an insurer may deliver or issue an automobile liability, automobile physical damage, or automobile collision policy in this state insuring a single individual or individuals residing in the same household, as named insured, and under which the insured vehicle is a motor vehicle with a load capacity exceeding 1,500 pounds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 136, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10.2. Prohibited Cancellations [670. - 670.]

670.

(a) No admitted insurer licensed to issue motor vehicle liability policies, as defined in Section 16450 of the Vehicle Code, shall cancel, or refuse to renew, a motor vehicle liability insurance policy covering drivers hired to drive by a commercial business establishment nor execute the agreement specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 11580.1 with respect to those drivers for the reason that those drivers have been convicted of violations of the Vehicle Code or the traffic laws of any subdivision of the state that were committed while operating private passenger vehicles not owned or leased by their employer.

(b) This section does not apply to drivers convicted of any of the following:

(1) Homicide or assault arising out of the operation of a private passenger motor vehicle.

(2) A violation while operating a private passenger motor vehicle of any of the following sections or section subdivisions of the Vehicle Code:

(A) Subdivision (a) of Section 14601.

(B) Subdivision (a) of Section 14601.1.

(C) Subdivision (a) of Section 14601.2.

(D) Section 20001 or 20002.

(E) Subdivision (a) of Section 20008.

(F) Section 23104 or 23105.

(G) Subdivision (c) of Section 23152.

(H) Section 23153.

(3) A violation, while operating a private passenger motor vehicle, of subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 23152 of the Vehicle Code punishable under Section 23540 or 23546 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 682, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10.25. Automobile Collision and Comprehensive Coverage [671. - 671.]

671.

No insurer issuing an automobile collision policy, as defined in Section 660, or a policy for comprehensive coverage for an automobile, as defined in Section 11580.07, shall refuse to issue the policy of insurance, or the policy in combination with other coverages, when the refusal is based solely on the age of the automobile to be insured, if the market value of the automobile exceeds two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

This section does not apply to any policy which includes coverage for losses resulting from wear and tear or from normal deterioration of an automobile or its component parts, nor to any policy which provides coverage for an antique or classic automobile.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1290, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10.27. Availability of Cost Estimates [672. - 672.]

672.

(a) Every admitted insurer or insurer group licensed to sell automobile insurance shall provide consumers of personal automobile insurance, as described in Section 660, with a cost estimate for its lowest priced personal automobile insurance policy at the limits the consumer has requested and for which the consumer is eligible.

(b) The insurer shall meet this requirement by either or both of the following:

(1) Maintaining a toll-free telephone number available to consumers in any geographic area in which the insurer is authorized or approved to write business in California. Upon request, the insurer shall provide the consumer with a cost estimate, or shall refer the consumer to an insurer representative or insurance broker-agent who shall, upon request, provide such an estimate based upon information provided by the consumer. The insurer shall make this toll-free number available to the consumer by maintaining a listing in the toll-free telephone directory.

(2) Maintaining an Internet Web site where consumers can obtain a cost estimate online, or be referred to an insurer representative or insurance broker-agent who shall, upon request, provide the cost estimate based upon information provided by the consumer.

(c) Each insurer shall provide the toll-free number or the Internet Web site address, or both, to the commissioner, who shall make the information available on the department’s Internet Web site and through the department’s consumer toll-free telephone line.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 765, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10.3. Cancellation of Policies When Premium Financed [673. - 673.]

673.

(a) As used in this section, “exercise the right to cancel” means the act of formally electing to use the right of the insured to cancel any insurance policy in accordance with and subject to the provisions of that policy when the right to use that right of the insured has been transferred or assigned by the insured in writing executed by, or on behalf of, the insured to a lender who has advanced to the insurer the premium for the policy. The transfer or assignment may be by power of attorney or other document. The transfer or assignment may, but need not, be accompanied by an assignment of any unearned premium due the insured on cancellation.

(b) No lender shall exercise the right to cancel a financed insurance policy because of the default of the insured under a premium payment loan agreement except in accordance with this section.

(c) Written notice of the exercise of the right to cancel shall be mailed by the lender to the insurer and to the insured at the address shown on the premium payment loan agreement or his or her last known address, specifying a date five days or more after the date of mailing of such notice as the effective date of cancellation. Any insurer may, in writing delivered to the lender, waive, generally or specifically, the right to receive such notice or notices. A copy of such notice may be mailed to the producer of record if known to the lender, but failure to do so shall not affect any rights granted by this section. This subdivision shall not apply to an industrial loan company.

(d) An industrial loan company shall, in giving the insured 10 days’ notice of its intent to cancel pursuant to Section 18608 of the Financial Code, furnish a copy of such notice to the insurance agent or insurance broker indicated on the premium finance agreement. After expiration of the 10-day period, the industrial loan company may thereafter, in the name of the insured, cancel the insurance contract or contracts by mailing to the insurer a written notice of cancellation, and the insurance contract shall be canceled as if the notice of cancellation had been submitted by the insured person, but without requiring the return of the insurance contract or contracts. The industrial loan company shall also mail a notice of cancellation, setting forth the effective date of cancellation of the finance insurance contract, to the insured at his or her last known address and to the insurance agent or insurance broker indicated on the premium finance agreement. For the purposes of this subdivision, the words “premium finance agreement” shall have the same meaning as that specified in Section 18564 of the Financial Code.

(e) A written exercise of that right containing a confirmation of the effective date of cancellation shall be mailed by the lender to the insurer within five days following that effective date of cancellation specified in the notice described in subdivision (c) unless the insured has cured any and all defaults. Cancellation shall be effective on the financed insurance policy without requiring the return of the insurance policy or insurance policies, except as provided in subdivisions (f) and (g), on the confirmation date specified in the written exercise of that right. This subdivision shall not apply to an industrial loan company.

(f) All statutory, regulatory, and contractual restrictions providing that the financed insurance policy may not be canceled unless notice is given to a governmental agency, mortgagee, or other third party shall apply where cancellation is effected under this section. The insurer shall give the prescribed notice on behalf of itself or the insured to any governmental agency, mortgagee, or other third party on or before the fifth business day after the day it receives the written exercise of cancellation right containing confirmation of the cancellation date from the lender, as provided in subdivision (e), or a written notice of cancellation from an industrial loan company, pursuant to subdivision (d), and shall, for the purpose of the notice, determine the effective date of cancellation as to those persons mentioned in this subdivision only, taking into consideration the number of days’ notice required to complete the cancellation.

(g) Whenever such a financed insurance policy is canceled by any party for any reason:

(1) The insurer shall, in accordance with the written agreements of which it has notice, return to the lender such unearned premiums as are due to the lender. The amount of the return premiums shall be based upon the confirmed date of cancellation specified in subdivision (e), or upon the written notice of cancellation specified in subdivision (d) in the case of an industrial loan company, lessened by the amount, if any, to compensate equitably the insurer for carrying the risk of loss as to any governmental agency, mortgagee, or other parties specified in subdivision (f) from that date to the effective date of cancellation as to those parties.

(2) When a financed insurance policy is canceled, or the insured discontinues payments to a lender, the insurer shall calculate the return premium on a pro rata basis. This paragraph shall not apply to any policy issued under an assigned risk plan or to any policy with respect to which the insurer has made a loan to the insured for the purposes of payment of premiums for the policy.

(h) The commissioner may amend the rules and regulations of any assigned risk plan, fair plan, or similar plan to provide for the equitable assignment of insurance risks among insurers now in existence or hereafter established, in such manner as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

(i) A lender which sends a written exercise of cancellation right or a written notice of cancellation to an insurer, as provided in subdivision (c), or subdivision (d) in the case of an industrial loan company, thereby represents that he or she has a valid right to do so and to receive the unearned premium. If the lender thereby accomplishes the cancellation and receives an unearned premium, such representation shall be conclusive as between the insurer and the lender. An insurer relying upon the written exercise of that right containing a confirmation of cancellation date and giving, when applicable, notice as required by subdivision (e), shall be relieved from complying with any other duty or form of cancellation required by this code.

(j) This section shall not apply where the insurer exercises its own right to cancel the policy for nonpayment of premium, direct or indirect, or otherwise. Such a cancellation shall be subject to all applicable provisions of the policy, this code, except this section, and any rights of the lender of which the insurer has written notice.

 (k) Whenever a lender or industrial loan company cancels a policy as described in this section and then requests the insurer to reinstate the policy, the insurer shall provide written notice by mail to the insured, agent/broker, and lender or industrial loan company within 15 days that the reinstatement has been accepted or rejected.

(l) This section shall apply only to contracts entered into between an insured and a lender on or after January 1, 1974.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 740, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10.4. Prior Notice Concerning Cancellation or Nonrenewal [674. - 674.9.]

674.

A policy of liability insurance issued to a local public entity or state agency as a named insured shall not be canceled or renewal of such a policy declined for reasons other than nonpayment of premium unless notice is mailed to the named insured at least 45 days prior to the effective date of nonrenewal or at least 60 days prior to the effective date of cancellation. Such notice need not be sent if a renewal notice stating a premium for an additional period of coverage has been sent the named insured at least 45 days before cancellation or expiration of an existing policy and such premium has not been tendered the insurer before such cancellation or expiration. This section shall not require that notice of cancellation or nonrenewal be given an additional insured added by way of endorsement or certificate of insurance.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 344.)
-------------------------------------------

674.5.

(a) No insurer shall cease to offer any particular class of commercial liability insurance without prior notification to the commissioner.

(b) The department shall adopt regulations implementing this section as emergency regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, except that for the purposes of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, any regulations adopted under this section shall be deemed to be necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare. These regulations shall remain in effect for 180 days. Unless the regulation provides for notification by some other classification or category, notification pursuant to this section shall be made for each class of insurance as defined by the Insurance Services Office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1329, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

674.6.

(a) No insurer issuing policies of insurance subject to Section 674.5 or 675 shall cease to offer any particular line of coverage without prior notification to the commissioner.

(b) Except as provided in Section 674.9, an insurer shall notify the department at least 60 days prior to the date it intends to withdraw wholly or substantially from a line of (1) commercial liability insurance, (2) any insurance defined in Section 660 or 675 when coverage is provided by a separate rider or endorsement for an activity for which the insured receives compensation, a stipend, or remuneration of any kind for the activity and then only to the extent of the coverage, (3) any other insurance defined in Section 660, or (4) any insurance issued to an individual or individuals covering a risk not arising from a business or commercial activity. Upon receipt of the notice, the commissioner may request and review additional information, as deemed necessary, and investigate the market conditions to determine whether that insurance may become not readily available in the voluntary insurance market as a result of the withdrawal.

(c) For purposes of this section, “intent to substantially withdraw” means an insurer’s intent to nonrenew in excess of 50 percent of its current policyholders in the line of coverage upon their next renewal.

(d) The commissioner shall adopt appropriate rules, regulations, and standards for purposes of implementing this section.

(e) Any insurer that has notified the commissioner pursuant to subdivision (b) shall (1) notify the commissioner within 10 days after the date given in the withdrawal notice if the insurer does not in fact withdraw that line of insurance from the market, or (2) notify the commissioner within 10 days after reentry if the insurer reenters that line after the withdrawal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 899, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

674.9.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 674.6, an insurer issuing policies of liability insurance to long-term health care facilities, residential care facilities for the elderly, or physicians who provide or oversee the provision of services to residents in long-term health care facilities or residential care facilities for the elderly shall notify the department at least 90 days prior to the date it intends to cease, withdraw, or substantially withdraw from offering liability policies to those facilities or physicians.

(b) Each insurer writing liability insurance for long-term health care facilities, residential care facilities for the elderly, or physicians who provide or oversee the provision of services to residents in long-term health care facilities or residential care facilities for
 the elderly shall, by a date to be set by the commissioner, but not more than once each calendar year, report to the commissioner information specified by him or her regarding liability policies for those facilities or physicians. The information shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) Whether the insurer is writing coverage for long-term health care facilities, residential care facilities for the elderly, or physicians who provide or oversee the provision of services to residents in long-term health care facilities or residential care facilities for the elderly, including new and renewal policies, and the types of policies it is writing.

(2) The number and types of long-term health care facilities or
 residential care facilities for the elderly and beds covered.

(3) The total amount of premiums from insureds, both written and earned, during the immediately preceding five calendar years.

(4) The total number of claims received, including the amount per claim.

(5) The number of claims incurred, together with the monetary amount reserved for loss and defense and cost containment expense for the immediately preceding accident year or report year.

(6) The number of claims closed with payment during the immediately preceding five calendar years, the total monetary amount paid for loss thereon, reported by the year the claim was incurred, and the total defense and cost containment expense paid thereon, reported by the year the claim was incurred.

(7) The monetary amount paid on claims, including the amount paid per claim, during the immediately preceding five calendar years
 to be reported separately by the year the claim was incurred, with defense and cost containment expense paid.

(8) The number of claims closed without payment during the immediately preceding five calendar years, reported by the year the claim was incurred, and the defense and cost containment expense paid thereon.

(9) The monetary amount reserved in the annual statement for loss and defense and cost containment expense for the immediately preceding calendar year for outstanding claims incurred but not reported to the insurer.

(10) The number and types of lawsuits filed against the insureds in the immediately preceding calendar year.

(11) Annualized information on investment income or loss,
 that shall be consistent with the reported information provided by insurers to the National Association of Insurance Commissioners.

(c) For the purposes of information collection conducted pursuant to this section, first priority shall be given by the department and commissioner to collecting and compiling information from insurers concerning long-term health care facilities and physicians providing services in those facilities, and, to the extent that departmental resources allow, secondary priority shall then be given to the collecting and compiling of information concerning residential care facilities for the elderly and the physicians who provide services in those facilities.

(d) Information that is collected for long-term health care facilities and the physicians for those facilities shall be collected, maintained, analyzed, and reported separately from information that is collected, maintained, analyzed, and
 reported concerning residential care facilities for the elderly, and the physicians for those facilities.

(e) As used in this section, “long-term health care facility” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 1418 of the Health and Safety Code.

(f) As used in this section, “residential care facilities for the elderly” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 1569.2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(g) Information collected by the department pursuant to this section shall be deemed official information and subject to the disclosure protections of Section 1040 of the Evidence Code. Nothing in this section shall require individualized information that would identify the amount paid by a specific insurer or facility to be released. However, nothing in this subdivision shall prevent the department from preparing reports and policy recommendations based on the data collected pursuant to this
 section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 400, Sec. 4.   (AB 2782)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------


